Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle A. Organization; General.

§ 81-27-4.101.
Organization and powers of state trust company.

Subject to the other provisions of this article, one or more persons may organize and charter a state trust company. A state trust company may perform any act as a fiduciary or engage in any trust business within or without this state.

Subject to Section 81-27-4.107, a state trust company may exercise the powers of a business corporation reasonably necessary or helpful to enable exercise of its specific powers under this chapter.

A state trust company may contribute to community funds, or to charitable, philanthropic, or benevolent instrumentalities conducive to public welfare, amounts that its board considers appropriate and in the interests of the state trust company.

Subject to Section 81-27-5.301, a state trust company may deposit trust funds with itself or an affiliate.

Subject to obtaining any required insurance from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, a state trust company may receive and pay deposits with or without interest, made by agencies of the United States Government or of a state, county, or municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.102.
Articles of association of state trust company.

The articles of association of a state trust company must be signed and acknowledged by each organizer and must contain:

The name of the state trust company;

The period of its duration, which may be perpetual;

The powers of the state trust company, which may be stated as:

All powers granted to a state trust company in this state; or

A list of the specific powers that the state trust company chooses and is authorized to exercise;

The aggregate number of shares, or participation shares in the case of a limited liability trust company, that the state trust company will be authorized to issue, the number of classes of shares or participation shares, which may be one or more, the number of shares or participation shares of each class if more than one (1) class, and a statement of the par value of the shares or participation shares of each class or that the shares or participation shares are to be without par value;

If the shares or participation shares are to be divided into classes, the designation of each class and statement of the preferences, limitations, and relative rights of the shares or participation shares of each class, which in the case of a limited trust association may be more fully set forth in the participation agreement;

Any provision limiting or denying to shareholders or participants the preemptive right to acquire additional or treasury shares or participation shares of the state trust company;

Any provision granting the right of shareholders or participants to cumulative voting in the election of directors or managers;

The aggregate amount of consideration to be received for all shares or participation shares initially issued by the state trust company, and a statement that all authorized shares or participation shares have been subscribed and that all subscriptions received provide for the consideration to be fully paid in cash before issuance of the charter;

Any provision consistent with law that the organizers elect to set forth in the articles of association for the regulation of the internal affairs of the state trust company or that is otherwise required by this chapter to be set forth in the articles of association;

The street address of the state trust company’s principal office required to be maintained under Section 81-27-2.003; and

The number of directors or managers constituting the initial board, which may not be fewer than five (5) or more than twenty-five (25), and the names and street addresses of the persons who are to serve as directors or managers until the first annual meeting of shareholders or participants or until successor directors or managers have been elected and qualified; or, at the option of the organizers of a limited liability trust company, that will have not fewer than five (5) or more than twenty-five (25) participants, a statement that management is vested in a board comprised of all participants, with management authority vested in each participant in proportion to the participant’s contribution to capital as adjusted from time to time to properly reflect any additional contribution, and the names and street addresses of the persons who are to be the initial managing participants.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.103.
Certificate to incorporate and organize.

Before any trust company may be organized and formed, the prospective incorporators shall give notice to the commissioner of their desire to engage in trust activities and apply for a certificate of authority to incorporate, and shall at the time file with the commissioner a copy of the proposed articles of incorporation, duly sworn to by one (1) of the prospective incorporators. The commissioner shall promptly give consideration to the application and make an examination of the proposed articles of incorporation to determine if they meet all requirements of law. The commissioner shall then make an investigation to determine if the necessity and other factors mentioned in Article 4 of this chapter requires that the proposed new trust company should be chartered and permitted to operate.

When the commissioner has completed the examination and made his investigation, he shall record his findings in writing and shall draw up his recommendations to the State Board of Banking Review, established in Section 81-3-12. At the request of the chairman, he shall thereupon, in writing, call a meeting of the board to give consideration to his findings and recommendations, such call to be issued at least ten (10) days in advance of the meeting. Such meetings shall be held within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date on which the prospective incorporators gave notice to the commissioner of their desire to engage in trust activities, applied for a certificate of authority to incorporate, and filed with the commissioner a copy of the proposed articles of incorporation. The commissioner shall at the same time give notice of the meeting of the board to the prospective incorporators of the proposed new trust company and to any and all other interested persons and shall extend to them an invitation to be heard in writing or in person by the board.

The board, at its meeting, shall consider the findings and recommendations of the commissioner and shall hear such oral testimony as he may wish to give, and shall also receive information and hear testimony from the prospective organizers of the proposed new trust company and from any and all other interested persons bearing upon the public necessity for the organization and operation of the new trust company.

After considering the record submitted to it by the commissioner and his oral testimony and considering such other information and evidence, either written or oral, which has come before it, the board shall decide if it has before it sufficient information and evidence upon which it can dispose of the application to form the new trust company. If it is determined that evidence and information is not sufficient, then the board shall order the commissioner to secure such additional information and evidence as it may prescribe or shall request from the prospective incorporators and from other interested persons. The board shall thereupon set a date for a future meeting to be held before the expiration of the aforementioned one-hundred-twenty-day time limit and shall give to the prospective incorporators and other interested persons notice of such meeting, and shall recess the meeting then being held until such future date. The board shall have and is vested with the power to compel attendance of witnesses just as is the commissioner or examiner as provided for in Section 81-1-85, and all testimony given before the board shall be taken down and transcribed by a stenographer in the manner prescribed in Section 81-1-87.

If the board, or a majority thereof, determines that it has before it sufficient evidence and information upon which to base a decision, then it shall render a written opinion and decision in the matter within sixty (60) days after the conclusion of the final board hearing. If its decision is favorable, then the board shall order the commissioner to give to such prospective incorporators a certificate under his hand and official seal of the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance authorizing the prospective incorporators to proceed to incorporate and organize as is provided in Section 81-27-4.102.

When a certificate of incorporation is sought in order to effect the acquisition of an insolvent trust company any constraints of time imposed by this subsection shall not apply if the commissioner determines that an emergency exists which requires expedition of the procedure for granting a certificate in order to protect the interests of the public and the interests of the clients of the insolvent trust company.

If the decision of the board, or a majority thereof, is unfavorable to the organization of the proposed new trust company, it shall render a written opinion and decision giving its reason for rejection within sixty (60) days after the conclusion of the final board hearing in the matter, and the commissioner shall so advise the prospective incorporators, giving them a copy of the written decision and opinion of the board. If the prospective incorporators are aggrieved at the unfavorable decision of the board in denying a certificate authorizing them to proceed with the incorporation of the proposed new trust company and the organization thereof, they shall have the right of appeal to the chancery court of the county in which the proposed trust company is to be located, which appeal shall be taken and perfected within sixty (60) days from the date of the denial of such certificate. The denial of the certificate by the board shall be construed as a judicial finding and appealable as such. All such appeals shall be taken, perfected, heard and determined either in termtime or vacation, and such appeals shall be heard and disposed of promptly by the court. Appeals from the board shall be taken and perfected by the filing of a bond in the sum of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), with two (2) sureties, or with a surety company qualified to do business in Mississippi as surety, conditioned to pay the costs of the appeal, the bond to be approved by the clerk of the chancery court, and such bond shall be payable to the state and may be enforced in its name as other judicial bonds filed in the chancery court, and judgment may be entered upon such bonds and process and execution shall issue upon such judgments as provided by law in other cases. Appeals may be taken from the chancery court to the Supreme Court in the manner provided by law. Upon approval of the bond by the clerk of the chancery court the clerk shall give notice to the commissioner of the appeal from the decision of the board, and it thereupon shall be the duty of the commissioner to promptly transmit to the clerk of the chancery court in which the appeal is pending the original or a certified copy of the application, proposed charter of incorporation, and his findings or decision thereon together with the opinion and decision of the board, including a transcript of pleadings and testimony, both oral and documentary, which shall be docketed by the clerk and shall be tried by the court. In perfecting such appeals, the provisions of law respecting notice to reporters and allowance of bills of exception, now or hereafter in force respecting appeals from the chancery court to the Supreme Court shall be applicable thereto. If the prospective incorporators of the proposed new trust company prevail, a decree shall be entered requiring the issuance by the commissioner of the certificate authorizing applicants to incorporate and organize in the same manner as if the application therefor had been approved by the board, and the costs therein incurred shall be paid by the commissioner out of the maintenance fund of the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance. However, if the action of the board is affirmed by the court, a decree shall be entered to that effect taxing costs of the proceedings to the applicants. The commissioner or the applicants shall have the right of appeal from the decision of the chancery court. During the time the cause is pending in the office of the commissioner or before the board or the court, the commissioner shall not issue a certificate to a subsequent applicant to incorporate and organize a new trust company or authorize any trust company then existing to establish a branch within the area in which the proposed new trust company is to be domiciled, and neither shall he consent to the removal of the domicile of an existing trust company from another place into the area where the proposed new trust company will be domiciled. A cause shall not be considered as pending in the office of the commissioner or before the board if the prospective incorporators or their representative have only given notice to the commissioner of their desire to engage in trust activities and apply for a certificate of authority to incorporate, but have not filed with the commissioner a copy of the proposed articles of incorporation and other documents required by statute or administrative regulation.

If the decision of the board, or a majority thereof, is favorable to the organization of the proposed trust company, it shall in like manner as above render a written opinion and decision within sixty (60) days after the conclusion of the final board hearing on the matter, and an appeal in the manner herein set forth shall be available to any interested organizations, person or persons who have participated in the proceedings and feel aggrieved by the decision of the board.

When a trust company has been incorporated and the capital stock thereof has been paid in full, the incorporators shall notify the commissioner of such fact, whereupon the commissioner himself or through an examiner shall make a special examination of the proposed new trust company and, finding the capital stock to have been paid in full, he shall under his hand and seal of the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance issue to the trust company a certificate authorizing it to commence business, and when such business has been commenced the trust company shall notify the commissioner to that effect. Upon completion of such special examination, the trust company shall pay to the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance as an assessment an amount sufficient to reimburse for the actual costs and expenses incurred during such special examination. The commissioner or examiner shall give a receipt therefor in duplicate, and the assessment shall be turned over by the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance to the State Treasurer for credit to the maintenance fund of the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance. The proposed new trust company shall not transact any business except as is necessarily preliminary to its incorporation and organization until it has been authorized by the commissioner to begin business. However, if the board rejects any application for a certificate to incorporate and organize, all costs incurred by the board in making a survey or holding a hearing on such application shall be borne by the petitioners.

Notwithstanding the foregoing and any other provision of law to the contrary, if a trust company has not been established and is not in operation within two (2) years from the date of the certificate to incorporate and organize such trust company or within two (2) years from the date upon which any appellate litigation with respect to such certificate has been concluded, the certificate shall expire. However, the State Board of Banking Review for good cause shown may extend the two-year period for not more than two (2) times for periods not exceeding six (6) months each. This provision shall in no way affect certificates issued before July 1, 1998.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.104.
Investigation for state trust company charter.

The commissioner shall investigate the proof that one or more viable markets exist within or outside of this state that may be served in a profitable manner by the establishment of the proposed state trust company. In making such a determination, the commissioner shall (i) examine the business plan which shall be submitted as part of the application for a state trust company charter and (ii) consider:

The market or markets to be served;

Whether the proposed organizational and capital structure and amount of initial capitalization is adequate for the proposed business and location;

Whether the anticipated volume and nature of business indicates a reasonable probability of success and profitability based on the market sought to be served;

Whether the proposed officers, directors, and managers, or managing participants, as a group, have sufficient fiduciary experience, ability, standing, competence, trustworthiness, and integrity to justify a belief that the proposed state trust company will operate in compliance with law and that success of the proposed state trust company is probable;

Whether each principal shareholder or participant has sufficient experience, ability, standing, competence, trustworthiness, and integrity to justify a belief that the proposed state trust company will be free from improper or unlawful influence or interference with respect to the state trust company’s operation in compliance with law; and

Whether the organizers are acting in good faith.

The failure of an applicant to furnish required information, data, opinions of counsel, other material or the required fee is considered an abandonment of the application.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.105.
Issuance of charter.

A state trust company may not engage in the trust business until it receives its charter from the commissioner. The commissioner may not deliver the charter until the state trust company has:

Received cash or marketable securities in at least the full amount of required capital from subscriptions for the issuance of shares or participation shares;

Elected or qualified the initial officers and directors or managers, as appropriate, named in the application for charter or other officers and directors or managers approved by the commissioner; and

Complied with all other requirements of this chapter relative to the organization of a state trust company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.106.
Required capital.

The commissioner may not issue a charter to a state trust company having required capital of less than Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) except as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

The commissioner may require additional capital for a proposed or existing state trust company or, on application in the exercise of discretion consistent with protecting safety and soundness, reduce the amount of minimum capital required for a proposed or existing state trust company, if the commissioner finds the condition and operations of an existing state trust company or the proposed scope or type of operations of a proposed state trust company requires additional, or permits reduced, capital consistent with the safety and soundness of the state trust company. The safety and soundness factors to be considered by the commissioner in the exercise of such discretion include but are not limited to,

The nature and type of business conducted;

The nature and degree of liquidity in assets held in a corporate capacity;

The amount of fiduciary assets under management;

The type of fiduciary assets held and the depository of such assets;

The complexity of fiduciary duties and degree of discretion undertaken;

The competence and experience of management;

The extent and adequacy of internal controls;

The presence or absence of annual unqualified audits by an independent certified public accountant;

The reasonableness of business plans for retaining or acquiring additional capital; and

The existence and adequacy of insurance obtained or held by the trust company for the purpose of protecting its clients, beneficiaries and grantors.

The proposed effective date of an order requiring an existing state trust company to increase its capital must be stated in the order as on or after the twenty-first day after the date the proposed order is mailed or delivered. Unless the state trust company requests a hearing before the commissioner in writing before the effective date of the proposed order, the order becomes effective and is final and nonappealable. This subsection does not prohibit an application to reduce capital requirements of a proposed or an existing state trust company under subsection (b) of this section.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section and Section 81-27-4.301, a state trust company to which the commissioner issues a charter shall at all times maintain capital in at least the amount required under subsection (a) of this section, plus any additional amount or less any reduction the commissioner directs under subsection (b) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.107.
Application of laws relating to general business corporations.

The Mississippi Business Corporation Act applies to a trust company to the extent not inconsistent with this chapter or the proper business of a trust company, except that:

A reference to the Secretary of State means the commissioner unless the context requires otherwise; and

The right of shareholders or participants to cumulative voting in the election of directors or managers exists only if granted by the state trust company’s articles of association.

Unless expressly authorized by this chapter or a rule or regulation of the commissioner, a trust company may not take an action authorized by the Mississippi Business Corporation Act regarding its corporate status, capital structure, or a matter of corporate governance, of the type for which the Mississippi Business Corporation Act would require a filing with the Secretary of State if the trust company were a business corporation, without first submitting the filing to the commissioner for the same purposes for which it otherwise would be required to be submitted to the Secretary of State.

The commissioner may adopt rules or regulations to limit or refine the applicability of subsection (a) of this section to a trust company or to alter or supplement the procedures and requirements of the Mississippi Business Corporation Act applicable to an action taken under this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-4.108.
Commissioner hearings; appeals.

This section does not grant a right to hearing to a person that is not otherwise granted by governing law.

The commissioner may convene a hearing to receive evidence and argument regarding any matter before the commissioner for decision or review under this chapter. The hearing shall be conducted in the same manner as other hearings conducted by the commissioner.

A hearing before the commissioner that is required or authorized by law may be conducted by a hearing officer on behalf of the commissioner. A matter made confidential by law must be considered by the commissioner in a closed hearing.

Except as expressly provided otherwise by this chapter, a person affected by a final decision or order of the commissioner made under this chapter after a hearing may appeal the final decision or order to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. A petition for appeal filed in the district court does not stay or vacate the appealed decision or order unless the court, after notice and hearing, expressly stays or vacates the decision or order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.